Illinois, session 104th, SB2730.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Court 5Access, Safety, and Participation Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds and declares the following: 8        (1) Illinois courts are a cornerstone of Illinois' 9    government, satisfying the right of every person to obtain 10    justice and find a remedy for all injuries and wrongs 11    under Section 12 of Article I of the Constitution of this 12    State and playing an essential role in the peaceful and 13    just resolution of disputes and the State's ability to 14    promote the public health, safety, and general welfare of 15    its residents. 16        (2) Access to courts and the court's ability to 17    administer justice is, therefore, a matter of statewide 18    concern, fostering fairness while promoting public 19    confidence in, and respect for, the judicial process.20        (3) Subjecting Illinois residents to arrest for civil, 21    non-criminal matters while attending, attempting to 22    attend, or after attending State court proceedings as 23    parties, witnesses, potential witnesses, or court   SB2730- 2 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1    companions, or while otherwise accompanying a person who 2    is a party, witness, or potential witness, threatens the 3    fair administration of justice in this State.4        (4) Victims and witnesses are increasingly reluctant 5    to attend and participate in court proceedings, or 6    otherwise access the justice system of this State, out of 7    fear of civil arrests when going to, remaining at, or 8    returning from a court proceeding.9        (5) Residents of this State, including victims of 10    crime, are less likely to report crimes and to use legal 11    services when civil arrests are conducted at courthouses 12    in this State or their environs.13        (6) Illinois courts and court staff bear increased 14    burdens and costs to their operations, through 15    adjournments, delays, and postponements caused by 16    witnesses' or parties' failure to appear out of fear of 17    civil arrests at courthouses or its environs.18        (7) The ability of Illinois attorneys to zealously 19    advocate for their clients and act as officers of the 20    legal system with special responsibilities for the quality 21    of justice in this State is threatened and impeded when 22    civil arrests are conducted at courthouses in this State 23    or their environs, forcing them to risk their clients' 24    freedom in the pursuit of diligent representation.25        (8) The civil arrest of individuals at a courthouse or 26    its environs or while going to, remaining at, or returning   SB2730- 3 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1    from a court proceeding threatens the functioning of the 2    court system and the fair administration of justice by 3    deterring litigants, witnesses, and others participating 4    in State court proceedings, jeopardizing the State courts' 5    and parties' access to evidence that may be critical to 6    fact-finding. 7        (9) The civil arrest of individuals at a courthouse or 8    its environs or while going to, remaining at, or returning 9    from a court proceeding threatens the public's right to 10    seek justice in the courts and the ability of Illinois 11    residents to peacefully resolve disputes by risking the 12    intimidation of parties and witnesses and deterring 13    litigants, witnesses, and others participating in State 14    court proceedings, limiting the parties' ability to 15    protect and vindicate rights guaranteed by the laws and 16    Constitution of this State. 17        (10) Illinois courts, as early as 1887, recognized the 18    long-standing common law privilege from civil arrest, 19    which has been established in English and American 20    jurisprudence for centuries and which has not been 21    legislatively repealed. Under this common law privilege, 22    the parties to a suit and their witnesses are protected 23    from arrest in coming to, attending, and returning from 24    court proceedings for the sake of public justice. 25        (11) The State of Illinois has sovereign interest and 26    authority to protect the effective functioning and   SB2730- 4 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1    operation of its judicial system.2        (12) Civil arrests of persons in and around Illinois 3    courthouses or those attending judicial proceedings 4    threaten all of the foregoing public and private values of 5    public access, as well as the core functions of Illinois 6    courts, and must be considered unreasonable and unlawful 7    seizures whether undertaken by local, State, or federal 8    officers. 9    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 10    "Arrest" means a law enforcement agency or its officers 11taking an individual into custody. 12    "Civil arrest" means an arrest that is not: 13        (1) a criminal arrest for an alleged criminal 14    violation of any federal, State, or local law;15        (2) an arrest for any violation of any condition of 16    probation, parole, pretrial release, supervised release, 17    or mandatory supervised release for which arrest is 18    otherwise authorized by law; or19        (3) an arrest supported by a judicial warrant or 20    judicial order authorizing the arrest. 21    "Court companion" means any of the following individuals 22whose purpose is to support, assist, or accompany a person who 23is going to, remaining at, or returning from a court 24proceeding: a spouse, domestic partner, or person who has a 25dating or engagement relationship with the party, witness, or   SB2730- 5 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1potential witness; a biological parent, foster parent, 2adoptive parent, or stepparent of a party, witness, or 3potential witness; minor children or other persons under the 4care of a party, witness, or potential witness; interpreters; 5translators; a person assisting the party, witness, or 6potential witness with reading or completing court forms or 7other documents; persons providing health care or assistance 8to a party, witness, or potential witness to allow that 9individual to participate in the court proceeding; a case 10manager or social worker for the party, witness, or potential 11witness; a domestic violence or sexual assault advocate; a 12person transporting a party, witness, or potential witness to 13or from the court proceeding.14    "Court proceeding" means the business conducted by a State 15court or a matter pending under the jurisdiction or 16supervision of a State court, including, but not limited to, 17civil proceedings and criminal proceedings. 18    "Judicial warrant or judicial order authorizing the 19arrest" means a written order from a State court or federal 20Article III court that directs a law enforcement agency or 21some other person who is specifically named in the order to 22arrest a person. 23    "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 24police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 25to make arrests.    SB2730- 6 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1    Section 15. Civil arrest prohibited; certain locations. 2    (a) A person duly and in good faith attending a State court 3proceeding in which the person is a party, a witness, a 4potential witness, or a court companion of a party, witness, 5or potential witness is privileged from civil arrest while 6going to, remaining at, and returning from the court 7proceeding, including: 8        (1) at the place of the court proceedings; 9        (2) within the courthouse building; 10        (3) on the premises of the courthouse, including 11    parking facilities serving the courthouse; 12        (4) on any sidewalk, parkway, and street surrounding 13    the courthouse and its premises; and14        (5) on any public way within 1,000 feet of the 15    courthouse including a sidewalk, parkway, or street.16    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to narrow, 17or in any way lessen, any common law or other right or 18privilege of a person privileged from arrest under this Act or 19otherwise. 20    (c) The protections in this Section apply regardless of 21whether a judicial order under Section 20 is issued or a court 22otherwise implements this Act by a rule or order.23    (d) Nothing in this Section precludes the execution of a 24criminal arrest warrant issued by a judge or a criminal arrest 25based on probable cause for a violation of criminal law.   SB2730- 7 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1    Section 20. Court order. In order to maintain access to 2the court and open judicial proceedings for all persons in 3their individual capacity and to prevent interference with the 4needs of judicial administration, a court may issue 5appropriate judicial orders to protect the privilege from 6arrest under this Act, Section 9 of the Attorney Act, or common 7law. 8    Section 25. Civil action; enforcement; remedies. 9    (a) A person who violates Section 15 or 20 of this Act is 10liable for civil damages for false imprisonment, including 11actual damages and statutory damages of $10,000, if that 12person knew or reasonably should have known that the person 13arrested is a person duly and in good faith attending a State 14court proceeding in which the person is a party, a witness, a 15potential witness, or a court companion of a party, witness, 16or potential witness while going to, remaining at, and 17returning from the court proceeding. 18    (b) A court may grant any other equitable or declaratory 19relief it deems appropriate and just. 20    (c) In any successful action under this Act, a plaintiff 21or petitioner may recover costs and reasonable attorney's 22fees. 23    (d) No action or proceeding may be commenced under this 24Section against the Illinois court system or any Illinois 25court system personnel acting lawfully under their duty to   SB2730- 8 -LRB104 16094 JRC 29384 b1maintain safety and order in the courts. 2    (e) Nothing in this Act affects any right or defense of any 3person, police officer, peace officer or public officer, or 4any Illinois court system personnel acting lawfully under 5their duty to maintain safety and order in the courts. 6    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.